Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-114
Division; represent state in aeronautical matters.

The division may represent the state in aeronautical matters before federal agencies and other state agencies.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(8), p. 85;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 13.
July 1, 2017